North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 29. Administrative Office of the Courts.
§ 7A-343.5.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

“Accounting system” means the total structure of records and procedures which discover, record, classify, and report information on the financial position and operating results of the Judicial Department, or a segment of the Judicial Department, or any of its funds, balanced account groups, and organizational components.

“Internal auditing” means an independent, objective assurance and consulting activity designed to add value to and improve an organization’s operations. Internal auditing helps an organization accomplish its objectives by using a systematic, disciplined approach to evaluate and improve the effectiveness of risk management, controls, and governance processes. The types of audits the internal auditors may provide include, but are not limited to:

Efficiency or economy audits to evaluate areas at risk and require improvements to promote operating effectiveness and efficiency, mitigate the risk of liability, and realize economies.

Financial audits to determine whether financial operations are properly functioning.

Compliance audits or reviews to assess compliance with laws and regulations.

Internal control audits to assess the controls related to financial transactions and reporting.

Case file and procedural audits to ensure efficiency, effectiveness, and compliance.

Performance and management audits entail an objective and systematic examination of evidence to provide an independent assessment of the performance and management of a program against objective criteria as well as assessments that provide a prospective focus or that synthesize information on best practices.

Investigative or fraud audits to make an independent assessment of allegations of fraud, misuse, or process manipulation or alleged violations of federal, State, or local laws.

History.

2009-516, s. 6.

§ 7A-343.6.
Electronic filing in Chapter 50B and Chapter 50C cases.

The North Carolina Administrative Office of the Courts is authorized to develop a program for electronic filing in Chapter 50B and Chapter 50C cases in district court in all counties in North Carolina. In order to implement the program in one or more counties in a district, the chief district court judge in each district shall draft local rules and submit the rules to the Administrative Office of the Courts for approval. The local rules shall permit the clerk of superior court for the county to accept electronically filed complaints requesting a domestic violence protective order pursuant to Chapter 50B of the General Statutes, or a civil no-contact order pursuant to Chapter 50C of the General Statutes, that are transmitted from a domestic violence program as defined in

G.S. 8-53.12

. The authorization for local rules shall be superseded by the promulgation of uniform State rules by the Supreme Court.

History.

2015-62, s. 3(a).

Cross References.

As to domestic violence, generally, see

G.S. 50B-1

et seq.

As to civil no-contact orders, generally, see

G.S. 50C-1

et seq.

§ 7A-344.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-144, s. 4, effective July 1, 2001.

§ 7A-345.
Duties of assistant director.

The assistant director is the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice, and his duties include the following:

Assist the Chief Justice in performing his duties relating to the assignment of superior court judges;

Assist the Supreme Court in preparing calendars of superior court trial sessions; and

Performing such additional functions as may be assigned by the Chief Justice or the Director of the Administrative Office.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1969, c. 1013, s. 4.

§ 7A-346.
Information to be furnished to Administrative Officer.

All judges, district attorneys, public defenders, magistrates, clerks of superior court and other officers or employees of the courts and of offices directly related to and serving the courts shall on request furnish to the Administrative Officer information and statistical data relative to the work of the courts and of such offices and relative to the receipt and expenditure of public moneys for the operation thereof.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 1049, s. 5; 1969, c. 1013, ss. 4, 5; 1973, c. 47, s. 2.

§ 7A-346.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-67, s. 15(b), effective July 1, 2000.

§ 7A-346.2.
Various reports to General Assembly.

The Administrative Office of the Courts and the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall report by March 1 of each year to the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees, to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Justice and Public Safety, and to the Chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety on contracts entered into with local governments for the provision of the services of assistant district attorneys, assistant public defenders, judicial secretaries, and employees in the office of the Clerk of Superior Court. The report shall include the number of applications made to the Administrative Office of the Courts or the Office of Indigent Defense Services for these contracts, the number of contracts entered for provision of these positions, and the dollar amounts of each contract.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-243, s. 5(b), effective November 6, 2019.

The Administrative Office of the Courts, in consultation with the Conference of Clerks of Superior Court, shall make any necessary modifications to its information systems to maintain records of all cases in which the defendant in a criminal case withdraws an appeal for trial de novo in superior court and the superior court judge has signed an order remanding the case to the district court and shall report on those remanded cases to the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the chairs of the House Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety, and the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety by February 1 of each year. The report shall (i) include the total number of remanded cases and also the total number of those cases for which the court has remitted costs and (ii) aggregate those totals by the district in which they were granted and by the name of each judge ordering remand. The Administrative Office of the Courts may obtain any information that may be needed from individual clerks of superior court in order to make the modifications necessary to maintain the records required under this section.

History.

1999-237, s. 17.7(c); 2000-67, ss. 15.3A(b), 15.4(h); 2001-61, s. 2; 2001-424, s. 22.11(g); 2003-377, s. 4; 2015-247, s. 2; 2019-243, s. 5(b).

Cross References.

As to contracts entered into for the provision of secretarial and clerical help, see

G.S. 7A-44.1

.

As to contracts entered into for the provision of assistant and deputy clerks, see

G.S. 7A-102

.

As to contracts entered into for the provision of assistant public defenders, see G.S. 7A-467.

As to the program for the collection of worthless check cases, see

G.S. 14-107.2

.

§ 7A-346.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-243, s. 5(c), effective November 6, 2019.

History.

2006-253, s. 20.2; 2011-291, s. 2.1; repealed by 2019-243, s. 5(c), effective November 6, 2019.

§ 7A-347.
District attorney legal assistants.

District attorney legal assistant positions are established under the district attorneys’ offices. Each prosecutorial district is allocated at least one district attorney legal assistant to be employed by the district attorney. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall allocate additional assistants to prosecutorial districts on the basis of need and within available appropriations. Each district attorney may also use any volunteer or other personnel to assist the assistant. The assistant is responsible for coordinating efforts of the law-enforcement and judicial systems to assure that each victim and witness is provided fair treatment under Article 45 of Chapter 15A, Fair Treatment for Victims and Witnesses and shall also provide administrative and legal support to the district attorney’s office.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 998, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.7(c); 2015-241, s. 18A.8(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 18A.8(a), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “District attorney legal assistants” for “Assistants for administrative and victim and witness services” in the section heading; “District attorney legal assistant” for “Assistant for administrative and victim and witness services” in the first sentence; and “district attorney legal assistant” for “assistant for administrative and victim and witness services” in the second sentence.

§ 7A-348.
Training and supervision of district attorney legal assistants.

Pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 7A-413

, the Conference of District Attorneys shall:

Assist in establishing uniform statewide training for district attorney legal assistants; and

Assist in the implementation and supervision of this program.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 998, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.7(d); 2001-424, s. 22.6(a); 2015-241, s. 18A.8(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 18A.8(b), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “district attorney legal assistants” for “assistants for administrative and victim and witness services” throughout the section.

§ 7A-349.
Criminal history record check; denial of employment, contract, or volunteer opportunity.

The Judicial Department may deny employment, a contract, or a volunteer opportunity to any person who refuses to consent to a criminal history check authorized under G.S. 143B-950 and may dismiss a current employee, terminate a contractor, or terminate a volunteer relationship if that employee, contractor, or volunteer refuses to consent to a criminal history record check authorized under G.S. 143B-950.

History.

2006-187, s. 3(b); 2014-100, s. 17.1(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(s), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “G.S. 143B-950” for “G.S. 114-19.19” twice.

§ 7A-350.
Annual report on criminal court cost waivers.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall maintain records of all cases in which a judge makes a finding of just cause to grant a waiver of criminal court costs under G.S. 7A-304(a) and shall report on those waivers to the chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety by February 1 of each year. The report shall aggregate the waivers by the district in which the waiver or waivers were granted and by the name of each judge granting a waiver or waivers.

History.

2015-241, s. 18A.3(a).

§ 7A-350.1.
Annual report on grant funds received or preapproved for receipt.

The Judicial Department shall report by May 1 of each year to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety on grant funds received or preapproved for receipt by the Department. The report shall include information on the amount of grant funds received or preapproved for receipt by the Department, the use of the funds, the State match expended to receive the funds, and the period to be covered by each grant. If the Department intends to continue the program beyond the end of the grant period, the Department shall report on the proposed method for continuing the funding of the program at the end of the grant period. The Department shall also report on any information it may have indicating that the State will be requested to provide future funding for a program presently supported by a local grant.

History.

2021-180, s. 19A.1(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.8, made this section, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19A.1(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§§ 7A-351 through 7A-353.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 7A-354.
North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission.

Establishment. — There is established in the Administrative Office of the Courts the North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission. For purposes of this section, “Commission” means the North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission.

Membership. — The Commission shall consist of no more than 15 members as follows:

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint one representative from each of the following:

The public at large.

A county sheriff’s office.

A city or town police department.

Legal Aid of North Carolina.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one representative from each of the following:

The public at large.

North Carolina Coalition Against Human Trafficking.

A faith-based shelter or benefits organization providing services to victims of human trafficking.

A district attorney or an assistant district attorney.

The Governor shall appoint one representative from each of the following:

The Department of Labor.

The Department of Justice.

The Department of Public Safety.

A health care representative.

The following persons, or their designees, may serve as nonvoting, ex officio members of the Commission:

The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts.

The President of the North Carolina Conference of Superior Court Judges.

The President of the North Carolina Association of District Court Judges.

Powers. — The Commission shall have the following powers:

To apply for and receive, on behalf of the State, funding from federal, public or private initiatives, grant programs, or donors that will assist in examining and countering the problem of human trafficking in North Carolina.

To commission, fund, and facilitate quantitative and qualitative research to explore the specific ways human trafficking is occurring in North Carolina and the links to international and domestic human trafficking, and to assist in creating measurement, assessment, and accountability mechanisms.

To contribute to efforts to inform and educate law enforcement personnel, social services providers, and the general public about human trafficking so that human traffickers can be prosecuted and victim-survivors can receive appropriate services.

To suggest new policies, procedures, or legislation to further the work of eradicating human trafficking and to provide assistance and review with new policies, procedures, and legislation.

To assist in developing regional response teams or other coordinated efforts to counter human trafficking at the level of law enforcement, legal services, social services, and nonprofits.

To identify gaps in law enforcement or service provision and recommend solutions to those gaps.

To consider whether human trafficking should be added to the list of criminal convictions that require registration under the sex offender and public protection registration program.

Terms and Chair. — Members shall serve two-year terms, with no prohibition against being reappointed. Any individual appointed to serve on the Commission shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The chair shall be appointed biennially by the Governor from among the membership of the Commission.

Meetings. — The chair shall convene the Commission. Meetings shall be held as often as necessary, but not less than four times a year.

A majority of the members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at meetings of the Commission shall be necessary for action to be taken by the Commission.

Vacancies. — A vacancy on the Commission or as chair of the Commission resulting from the resignation of a member or otherwise shall be filled in the same manner in which the original appointment was made, and the term shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

Removal. — The Commission may remove a member for misfeasance, malfeasance, nonfeasance, or neglect of duty.

Compensation. — Commission members shall receive no per diem for their services but shall be entitled to receive travel allowances in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

or

G.S. 138-6

, as appropriate.

Staffing. — The Administrative Office of the Courts shall be responsible for staffing the Commission.

Funding. — From funds available to the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Director shall allocate monies to fund the work of the Commission.

History.

2012-142, s. 15.3A(a)-(k); 2012-194, s. 55.5; 2013-368, ss. 23, 24; 2014-115, s. 47; 2018-5, s. 18B.7; 2018-75, s. 7; 2018-97, ss. 5.6(a), (b); 2019-243, s. 20.